Hawaii statutes.
§435E-44 Hearing, subpoena. For the
purpose of any investigation or proceeding, the commissioner or any person
designated by the commissioner may hold hearings subject to chapter 91. [L
1977, c 182, pt of §1; am L 1982, c 203, §16; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next